Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.115

Securities prosecution fund.

(1) The securities prosecution fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall consist of all fines received by the division of securities under RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395 and all undistributed funds from orders of disgorgement and restitution under RCW 21.20.110(8) and 21.20.390(6). No appropriation is required to permit expenditures from this fund, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2) Expenditures from this fund may be used solely for administering the fund, for payment of costs, expenses, and charges incurred in the preparation, initiation, and prosecution of criminal charges for violations of chapters 21.20, 21.30, 19.100, and 19.110 RCW, and for making an award to a whistleblower under RCW 21.40.020. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.

(3) Except for an award to a whistleblower under RCW 21.40.020, applications for fund expenditures must be submitted by the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney to the director. The application must clearly identify the alleged criminal violations identified in subsection (2) of this section and indicate the purpose for which the funds will be used. The application must also certify that any funds received will be expended only for the purpose requested. Funding requests must be approved by the director prior to any expenditure being incurred by the requesting attorney general or prosecuting attorney. At the conclusion of the prosecution, the attorney general or prosecuting attorney shall provide the director with an accounting of fund expenditures, a summary of the case, and certify his or her compliance with any rules adopted by the director relating to the administration of the fund.

(4) If the balance of the securities prosecution fund reaches $1,000,000, all fines received by the division of securities under RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395 and all undistributed funds from orders of disgorgement and restitution under RCW 21.20.110(8) and 21.20.390(6) shall be deposited in the financial services regulation fund until such time as the balance in the fund falls below $1,000,000, at which time the fines received by the division of securities under RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395 and all undistributed funds from orders of disgorgement and restitution under RCW 21.20.110(8) and 21.20.390(6) shall be deposited to the securities prosecution fund until balance in the fund once again reaches $1,000,000.

[ 2023 c 149 s 13; 2003 c 288 s 2.]